Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
PART 10
LIMITATIONS ON SOURCES OF REVENUE

29-1-1001. Moratorium on taxes, fees, and charges - internet and online services - definitions.

From May 1, 1998, to and including April 30, 2001, there shall be a temporary moratorium during which no statutory or home rule city and county, county, city, or town, nor any political subdivision of the state, including, without limitation, a special purpose authority, special district, or school district, shall impose, assess, or collect any tax, fee, or charge, however designated, upon the direct charges for provision of internet access services.

Paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall not apply to taxes on internet access services actually collected and enforced by a home rule city on or before April 15, 1998.

Paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall not apply to any franchise fee on interactive computer services delivered via a cable television system unless the federal communications commission or a court of competent jurisdiction determines that such services are not cable services within the meaning of 47 U.S.C. sec. 522 (6).

(1.5) (a) On and after April 30, 2001, no statutory or home rule city and county, county, city, or town, or any political subdivision of the state, including, without limitation, a special purpose authority, special district, or school district, shall impose, assess, or collect any tax, fee, or charge, however designated, upon the direct charges for provision of internet access services, whether offered separately or as part of a package or bundle of services.

Paragraph (a) of this subsection (1.5) shall not apply to taxes on internet access services actually collected and enforced by a home rule city on or before April 15, 1998.

Paragraph (a) of this subsection (1.5) shall not apply to any franchise fee on interactive computer services delivered via a cable television system unless the federal communications commission or a court of competent jurisdiction determines that such services are not cable services within the meaning of 47 U.S.C. sec. 522 (6).

From May 1, 1998, to and including April 30, 2001, there shall be a temporary moratorium during which no provider of internet access services shall be required to collect sales or use taxes from persons who purchase taxable property or services through use of the internet unless such provider acts as a vendor of taxable property or services.

(2.5) On and after April 30, 2001, no provider of internet access services shall be required to collect sales or use taxes from persons who purchase taxable property or services through use of the internet unless such provider acts as a vendor of taxable property or services.

As used in this section:

"Internet" means the international computer network consisting of federal and nonfederal, interoperable, packet-controlled, switched data networks.

"Internet access services" means services that provide or enable computer access by multiple users to the internet, but shall not include that portion of packaged or bundled services providing phone or television cable services when the package or bundle includes the sale of internet access services.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that:

Access to the internet insures access to information and government services, therefore, it is crucial that all people living in Colorado have equal access to the internet regardless of economic standing, educational background, or location. It is in the state's interest to ensure that local governments do not impose taxes on internet access, as such local taxation would inhibit equal access to the internet and the accessibility of online services for the people living in any local jurisdiction that imposes an internet access tax.

Any tax on internet access imposed by a local government would present unique administrative challenges for the internet service providers required to collect that tax. Such issues include, but are not limited to, tracking which local governments impose a tax, ascertaining the location of every customer, and determining the customers from which a tax must be collected. These logistical concerns may result in an internet service provider refusing to offer service to customers living in local jurisdictions that impose a tax on internet access, thus reducing competition and disenfranchising certain localities from affordable online services.

The promotion of economic development is of the utmost importance for Colorado. To foster the state's economic growth, Colorado strives to become a center for electronic commerce and taxing internet access on the state or local level would impede that goal.

The general assembly further finds, determines, and declares that the imposition, assessment, or collection of any tax, fee, or charge, however designated, upon the direct charges for the provision of internet access service is a matter of statewide concern and the provisions of this section shall preempt any provisions of any local government ordinance, resolution, regulation, or other restriction to the contrary.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire part added, p. 735, § 2, effective May 18.

L. 2000:

(1.5), (2.5), and (4) added and (3)(b) amended, p. 735, § 2, effective August 2.

29-1-1002. Mobile telecommunications services - taxation by local governments - remedies - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Act" means the federal "Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act", 4 U.S.C. secs. 116 to 126, as amended.

"Customer" means customer as defined in section 124 (2) of the act.

"Home service provider" means home service provider as defined in section 124 (5) of the act.

"Local government" means any statutory or home rule city and county, county, city, or town, and any political subdivision of the state, including, without limitation, any authority, special district, or school district.

"Mobile telecommunications service" means mobile telecommunications service as defined in section 124 (7) of the act.

"Place of primary use" means the place of primary use as defined in section 124 (8) of the act.

"Taxing jurisdiction" means taxing jurisdiction as defined in section 124 (12) of the act.

On and after August 1, 2002, any local government that imposes a sales tax pursuant to section 39-26-104 (1)(c), C.R.S., on a mobile telecommunications service shall impose such tax in accordance with the provisions of the act.

Pursuant to section 117 (b) of the act, mobile telecommunications service taxable by a local government on or after August 1, 2002, may be subject to any sales tax or other charge imposed by said local government on the service only if the customer's place of primary use is within the geographical boundaries of the local government.

If a customer believes that a tax, charge, or fee assessed by a local government in the customer's bill for a mobile telecommunications service is erroneous, or that an assignment of place of primary use or taxing jurisdiction on said bill is incorrect, the customer shall notify the home service provider in writing within two years after the date the bill was issued. The notification from the customer shall include the street address for the customer's place of primary use, the account name and number for which the customer seeks a correction, a description of the alleged error, and any other information that the home service provider may require.

No later than sixty days after receipt of notice from a customer pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), the home service provider shall review the information submitted by the customer and any other relevant information and documentation to determine whether an error was made. If the home service provider determines that an error was made, the home service provider shall refund or credit to the customer any tax, fee, or charge erroneously collected from the customer for a period not to exceed two years. If the home service provider determines that no error was made, the home service provider shall provide a written explanation of its determination to the customer.

Any customer that believes a tax, charge, or fee assessed by a local government in the customer's bill for mobile telecommunications services is erroneous, or that an assignment of place of primary use or taxing jurisdiction on said bill is incorrect may file a claim in the appropriate district court only after complying with the provisions of this subsection (3).

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 251, § 2, effective April 12.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 92, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.